Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-1006
Compulsive Gamblers Assistance Fund; created; use; investment.

The Compulsive Gamblers Assistance Fund is created. The fund shall include revenue transferred from the State Lottery Operation Trust Fund under section 9-812 and the Charitable Gaming Operations Fund under section 9-1,101 and any other revenue received by the commission for credit to the fund from any other public or private source, including, but not limited to, distributions of annual gaming tax proceeds as provided in section 9-1204, grants, donations, gifts, devises, bequests, fees, or reimbursements. The commission shall administer the fund for the operation of the Gamblers Assistance Program. The Director of Administrative Services shall draw warrants upon the Compulsive Gamblers Assistance Fund upon the presentation of proper vouchers by the commission. Money from the Compulsive Gamblers Assistance Fund shall be used exclusively for the purpose of providing assistance to agencies, groups, organizations, and individuals that provide education, assistance, and counseling to individuals and families experiencing difficulty as a result of problem gambling, to promote the awareness of problem gamblers assistance programs, and to pay the costs and expenses of the Gamblers Assistance Program, including travel. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 33;

R.S.Supp.,1994, § 9-804.05;

Laws 1995, LB 275, § 17;

Laws 2000, LB 659, § 3;

Laws 2001, LB 541, § 5;

R.S.Supp.,2002, § 83-162.04;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 17;

Laws 2005, LB 551, § 7;

Laws 2008, LB1058, § 2;

Laws 2009, LB189, § 2;

R.S.1943, (2009), § 71-817;

Laws 2013, LB6, § 6;

Laws 2026, LB1001, § 37.
July 1, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.